Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.052

District-based elections—When required—Procedures.

(1) Beginning in 2022, any noncharter county with a population of four hundred thousand or more must have a board of commissioners with five members, and must use district nominations and district elections for its commissioner positions, in accordance with RCW 36.32.050.

(a) By April 30, 2021, the county must establish a redistricting committee, in accordance with RCW 36.32.053, to create, review, and adjust county commissioner districts in accordance with subsection (1) of this section. The commissioner districts established by the redistricting committee must be designated as districts numerically one through five. Any districting plan adopted by the redistricting committee must designate the initial terms of office for each of the county commissioner positions, as provided in RCW 36.32.030(2).

(b) Beginning in 2022, district elections for all county commissioners in a noncharter county with a population of four hundred thousand or more must be held in accordance with any districting plan adopted by a redistricting committee that is established in accordance with RCW 36.32.054.

(2) After 2022, by April 30th of each year ending in one, each qualifying county must establish a redistricting committee in accordance with RCW 36.32.053. The redistricting committee must review and adjust as necessary the boundaries of the county's commissioner districts.

[ 2018 c 301 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Short title—2018 c 301: See notes following RCW 36.32.051.